Arkansas, session 2025, SB464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-59-248, as amended by Acts 2025, No.
125, is amended to read as follows:
20-59-248. Incidental sales of goat milk, sheep milk, and whole milk
that has not been pasteurized Sale of raw milk and raw milk products not
prohibited — Definitions.
(a) For purposes of As used in this section:
(1) “Incidental sales of goat milk, sheep milk, and whole milk
that has not been pasteurized” are those sales where the average monthly
number of gallons sold does not exceed five hundred gallons (500 gals.);
(2) “Locally produced whole milk products” means whole milk that
has been produced on an Arkansas farm;
*JMB011*
03-31-2025 14:26:16 JMB011

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB464
(2) "Raw milk" means goat milk, sheep milk, and whole milk that
has not been pasteurized;
(3) "Raw milk product" means a consumer product that is the
result of processes that include raw milk or raw cream as an ingredient
including without limitation butter, buttermilk, cheese, cottage cheese,
kefir, yogurt, colostrum, and other derivative products that use raw milk as
an ingredient; and
(3)(A)(4)(A) “Whole milk” means the lacteal secretion obtained
by the complete milking of one (1) or more healthy cows, properly fed and
kept, that when offered for sale contains at least three and one-fourth
percent (3.25%) of butterfat and eight and one-fourth percent (8.25%) solids
not fat.
(B) “Whole milk” does not include lacteal secretion
obtained within fifteen (15) days before or five (5) days after calving or a
longer period if necessary to render the milk practically colostrum free.
(b) This subchapter does not:
(1) Prohibit incidental sales of raw goat milk, raw sheep milk,
raw milk, raw milk products, and whole milk that has not been pasteurized
directly to consumers:
(A) At the farm where the milk is produced;
(B) At a farmer's market; or
(C) At a natural food store; or
(D) Via delivery from the farm where the milk is produced;
or
(2) Preclude the advertising of incidental sales of goat milk,
sheep milk, raw milk, raw milk products, and whole milk that has not been
pasteurized.
(c) With respect to raw milk and whole milk that has not been
pasteurized, the seller shall:
(1) Post at the point of sale a sign that is no smaller than two
feet by four feet (2′ x 4′) eighteen inches by twenty-four inches (18" x 24")
that includes the following information in large, clear text:
(A) The name and address of the farm with seller's contact
information; and
(B) The following statement:
“This product, sold for personal use and not for resale, is
03-31-2025 14:26:16 JMB011

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB464
fresh whole milk that has NOT been pasteurized. Neither this farm nor the
milk sold by this farm has been inspected by the State of Arkansas. The
consumer assumes all liability for health issues that may result from the
consumption of this product.”; and
(2) Affix a label to the bottle or package that includes:
(A) The name and address of the farm; and
(B) The following statement:
“This product, sold for personal use and not for resale, is
fresh whole milk that has NOT been pasteurized. Neither this farm nor the
milk sold by this farm has been inspected by the State of Arkansas. The
consumer assumes all liability for health issues that may result from the
consumption of this product.”
(d) A farmer who sells fresh whole unpasteurized milk shall permit
inspection of his or her cows and barns by his or her customers upon request.
(e) Raw milk products produced in this state may be sold at a location
that is not the farm where the raw milk product is produced if:
(1) The raw milk product is clearly labeled with the following
statement:
"WARNING: This product, sold for personal use and not for resale,
is a product that has NOT been pasteurized and may contain harmful bacteria
that can cause serious illness. The consumer assumes all liability for health
issues that may result from the consumption of this product.";
(2) The raw milk product is always refrigerated or on ice and
kept at a temperature at or below forty degrees Fahrenheit (40° F) before the
sale to the consumer; and
(3) The consumer signs an acknowledgment of risk that the
consumer assumes all liability for health issues that may result from the
consumption of the raw milk product.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under present state law, raw
milk products are not allowed to be sold in farmers' markets; that legalizing
the sale of raw milk products, especially unpasteurized cheese, increases the
potential for farmers to produce more products for sale; that farmers need
immediate certainty on the law to be able to produce raw milk products,
especially as the biggest goat cheese production month is April; and that
03-31-2025 14:26:16 JMB011

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB464
this act is immediately necessary to provide certainty on the law concerning
the sale of raw milk products. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/A. Clark
























03-31-2025 14:26:16 JMB011